Wisconsin, session 2025, SB25.
do enact as follows:SB25,1Section 1. 968.02 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 968.02 (3) (a).SB25,2Section 2. 968.02 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:968.02 (3) (b) Notwithstanding par. (a), unless there is new or unused evidence presented, a circuit court may not permit the filing of a complaint against a law enforcement officer who is involved in an officer-involved death, as defined in s. 175.47 (1) (c), if a district attorney determines there is no basis to prosecute the officer.SB25,3Section 3. 968.26 (2) (d) of the statutes is renumbered 968.26 (2) (d) 1.SB25,4Section 4. 968.26 (2) (d) 2. of the statutes is created to read:968.26 (2) (d) 2. Notwithstanding subd. 1., unless there is new or unused evidence presented, the judge may not issue a complaint against a law enforcement officer who is involved in an officer-involved death, as defined in s. 175.47 (1) (c), if the district attorney determines there is no basis to prosecute the officer.SB25,5Section 5. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to determinations made by a district attorney on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb25 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb25 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB25 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB25 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB25: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting